Wyoming, session 2025, HB0222.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
Section 1. W.S. 35-34-101 through 35-34-106 are
created to read:

CHAPTER 34
MEDICAL ETHICS DEFENSE ACT

35-34-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Medical Ethics Defense Act."

35-34-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Conscience" means the ethical, moral or
religious beliefs or principles held by any health care
professional, health care institution or health care payer.
For health care institutions and health care payers,
conscience shall be determined by reference to the health
care institution's or health care payer's governing
documents, including any published ethical, moral or
religious guidelines or directives, mission statements,
HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
constitutions, articles of incorporation, bylaws, policies
or regulations;

(ii) "Discrimination" means an adverse action
against or the communication of a threat of adverse action
to any health care professional, health care institution or
health care payer as a result of a decision by the health
care professional, health care institution or health care
payer not to participate in or pay for a health care
service that violates the conscience of the health care
professional, health care institution or health care payer.
"Discrimination" shall not include:

(A) Declining to use, or the refusal to use
or purchase health care services from a specific health
care professional, health care institution or health care
payer if that health care professional, health care
institution or health care payer exercises the right not to
participate in or pay for health care services that violate
its conscience;

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
(B) Good faith efforts to accommodate
conscientious objections of a health care professional,
health care institution or health care payer.

(iii) "Health care institution" means as defined
by W.S. 35-22-402(a)(x);

(iv) "Health care payer" means any employer,
health plan, health maintenance organization, insurance
company, management services corporation or any other
entity that pays for or arranges for the payment of any
health care service provided to any person, whether the
payment is made in whole or in part;

(v) "Health care professional" means any person
who may be or is asked to participate in any health care
service, including doctors, nurse practitioners, physician
assistants, nurses, nurse aides, allied health
professionals, medical assistants, hospital employees,
clinic employees, nursing home employees, pharmacists,
pharmacy technicians, pharmacy employees, medical school
faculty and students, nursing school faculty and students,
psychology and counseling faculty and students, medical
HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
researchers, laboratory technicians, psychologists,
psychiatrists, counselors, mental health professionals,
social workers or any other person who facilitates or
participates in a health care service;

(vi) "Health care service" means medical
research or health care provided to any person at any time
over the course of treatment, including testing, diagnosis,
referral, the prescribing, dispensing or administering of
any drug, medication or device, psychological therapy or
counseling, research, prognosis, therapy, record making or
record keeping, notes relating to treatment, the
preparation for or performance of a surgery or procedure or
any other medical care or service provided by any health
care professional;

(vii) "This act" means W.S. 35-34-101 through
35-34-106.

35-34-103. Rights of conscience for health care
professionals, health care institutions and health care
payers.

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
(a) Each health care professional, health care
institution and health care payer shall have the right not
to participate in or pay for a health care service that
violates the health care professional's, health care
institution's or health care payer's conscience. No health
care professional, health care institution or health care
payer shall be required to participate in or pay for any
health care service that violates the health care
professional's, health care institution's or health care
payer's conscience. The right of conscience provided under
this subsection shall:

(i) Be limited to a specific health care
service;

(ii) Not be construed to waive or modify any
duty a health care professional, health care institution or
health care payer has to provide or pay for health care
services that do not violate the health care
professional's, health care institution's or health care
payer's conscience;

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
(iii) Not be construed to waive or modify any
duty of a health care professional or health care
institution to provide other health care services or
emergency medical treatment under 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd.

(b) The right of conscience provided under subsection
(a) of this section shall not be construed to undermine the
right of a religious health care professional, health care
institution or health care payer that holds itself out to
the public as religious, states in its governing documents
that it has a religious purpose or mission and has internal
operating policies and procedures that implement its
religious beliefs to make employment, staffing, contracting
and admitting privilege decisions consistent with its
religious beliefs.

35-34-104. Participation in health care services;
discrimination prohibited.

(a) No person or entity, including the state and its
political subdivisions, shall discriminate against any
health care professional, health care institution or health
care payer for exercising the right not to participate in
HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
or pay for health care services that violate the right of
conscience under this act.

(b) No person or entity, including the state and its
political subdivisions, shall discriminate against a health
care professional or health care institution for:

(i) Providing a health care professional's
employer, the department of health or the attorney general
of Wyoming information relating to any violation of or any
act or omission that the health care professional or health
care institution reasonably believes violates this act; or

(ii) Testifying, assisting, participating or
agreeing to testify, assist or participate in a proceeding
concerning a violation of this act.

(c) Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited
by law, no health care professional shall be subject to
discrimination for disclosing any information that the
health care professional reasonably believes violates:

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
(i) Any federal or state law, rule or
regulation;

(ii) Any standard of care or other ethical
guidelines for the provision of any health care service; or

(iii) Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of
funds, an abuse of authority, practice or methods of
treatment that may place a patient's health at risk or a
substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.

(d) The state, any political subdivision, the
department of health or a board, certifying agency or
licensing agency shall not discriminate against, reprimand,
sanction or revoke or threaten to revoke a license,
certificate, certification or registration of a health care
professional for engaging in speech or expressive activity
protected by the first amendment to the United States
constitution unless the state, political subdivision,
department, board or agency demonstrates beyond a
reasonable doubt that the health care professional's speech
was the direct cause of physical harm to a person with whom
the health care professional had established a health care
HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
professional-patient relationship within the immediately
preceding three (3) years before the incident of physical
harm.

(e) Not later than fourteen (14) days after receipt,
the department of health or any board, certifying agency or
licensing agency, as applicable to the health care
professional, shall provide a health care professional with
notice of any complaint or action to suspend or revoke the
health care professional's license, certificate,
certification or registration. The department or a board or
agency that fails to provide notice under this subsection
shall be liable for damages of five hundred dollars
($500.00) for each full or partial week that the notice is
not provided to the health care professional. This
subsection shall not apply if notice of a complaint or
action is required to be provided within a shorter period
of time under another provision of law.

35-34-105. Right of conscience and right of refusal;
immunity from liability.

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
(a) No health care professional, health care
institution or health care payer shall be subject to civil
or criminal liability for exercising the right not to
participate in or pay for any health care service that
violates the right of conscience provided in W.S.
35-34-103(a).

(b) No health care institution shall be subject to
civil or criminal liability for a health care professional
employed, contracted or granted admitting privileges by the
health care institution for the health care professional
exercising the professional's right not to participate in a
health care service that violates the right of conscience
provided under W.S. 35-34-103(a).

35-34-106. Health care services and right of
conscience; civil remedies.

A health care professional, health care institution or
health care payer may bring a civil action for damages or
injunctive relief, or both, in a court of competent
jurisdiction for any alleged violation of this act.

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
Section 2.

(a) This act shall apply to health care services
provided, and health care payment obligations, that were
provided or arose on and after July 1, 2025.

(b) This act shall not be construed to supersede any
law of the state that is equally as protective of the
conscience or more protective of the conscience than this
act.

Section 3. The department of insurance and the
department of health shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement this act.

HB0222

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0687
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0222